Missouri, session 2026, HB3378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.906, to read as follows:
227.906. The portion of the State Highway 9 from Horizons Parkway continuing
2 north to Park College Entrance Drive in Platte County shall be designated as
3 "Firefighter Paramedic Graham J Hoffman Memorial Highway". The department of
4 transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway,
5 with the costs to be paid by the department of transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.